District of Columbia statutes.
32-131.07

Encouragement of more generous paid leave policies.

This chapter shall not prevent an employer from the adoption or retention of a paid leave policy more generous than the one required by this chapter.

May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-152, § 8, 55 DCR 3452